Wyoming, session 2026, SF0057.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-2-1501 through 35-2-1507 are
created to read:
ARTICLE 15
HOSPITAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY ACT
35-2-1501. Short title; purpose; sunset.
(a) This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Hospital Price Transparency Act."
(b) The purpose of this act is to require hospitals
to disclose prices for certain items and services and to
provide civil penalties.
(c) This article is repealed effective July 1, 2029.
35-2-1502. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(i) "Department" means the department of health;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0057
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) "De-identified maximum negotiated charge"
means the highest charge a facility has negotiated with any
third party payors for a facility item or service;
(iii) "De-identified minimum negotiated charge"
means the lowest charge a facility has negotiated with any
third party payors for a facility item or service;
(iv) "Discounted cash price" means the charge
that applies to a person who pays cash, or a cash
equivalent, for a facility item or service;
(v) "Facility" means a hospital located within
the state and licensed under title 35, chapter 2, article 9
of the Wyoming statutes;
(vi) "Facility item or service" means all items
and services, including individual items and services and
service packages, that may be provided by a facility to a
patient in connection with an inpatient admission or an
outpatient department visit, including:
(A) Supplies and procedures;
(B) Room and board;
(C) Use of the facility and other areas,
generally referred to as facility fees;
(D) Services of health care providers,
generally referred to as professional charges;
(E) Any other item or service offered by
the facility.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0057
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(vii) "Gross charge" means the charge for a
facility item or service that is reflected on a facility's
list, less any discounts;
(viii) "Machine-readable format" means a digital
representation of information that can be imported or read
into a computer system for processing;
(ix) "Payor-specific negotiated charge" means
the charge that a facility has negotiated with a third
party payor for a facility item or service;
(x) "Shoppable service" means a facility item or
service that may be scheduled by a patient in advance;
(xi) "Standard charge" means the regular rate
established by the facility for a facility item or service
provided to a specific group of paying patients. The term
includes all of the following:
(A) The gross charge;
(B) The payor-specific negotiated charge;
(C) The de-identified minimum negotiated
charge;
(D) The de-identified maximum negotiated
charge;
(E) The discounted cash price.
(xii) "Third party payor" means a person who is,
by statute, contract or agreement, legally responsible for
payment of a claim for a facility item or service;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0057
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(xiii) "This act" means W.S. 35-2-1501 through
35-2-1507.
35-2-1503. List of standard charges required.
(a) A facility shall:
(i) Maintain a list of all standard charges for
facility items or services in accordance with this section;
(ii) Maintain a list of the standard charges
required under paragraph (i) of this subsection for not
less than three hundred (300) shoppable services provided
by the facility, or as many of the shoppable services the
facility provides, in accordance with this section; and
(iii) Make the lists required by paragraphs (i)
and (ii) of this subsection available to the public at all
times.
(b) The lists required to be maintained by a facility
under subsection (a) of this section shall reflect the
standard charges applicable to each location as required by
federal rules and regulations.
(c) The lists required under subsection (a) of this
section shall include the following items, if applicable:
(i) A description of each facility item or
service provided by the facility;
(ii) The following charges, expressed in dollar
amounts, for each individual facility item or service:
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0057
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) All standard charges;
(B) Any code used by the facility for
purposes of accounting or billing; and
(C) A list of charges for shoppable
services as required by paragraph (a)(ii) of this section,
including but not limited to:
(I) The charges for shoppable services
specified by the centers for Medicare and Medicaid services
in 45 C.F.R. part 180; or
(II) If the facility does not provide
all of the shoppable services described by subdivision (I)
of this subparagraph, then the facility shall provide as
many of the charges for those shoppable services as the
facility does provide.
(d) The lists required by subsection (a) of this
section shall be displayed in a prominent location on the
home page of the facility's publicly accessible website or
accessible through a link on that website.
(e) The lists required under subsection (a) of this
section shall:
(i) Be available:
(A) Free of charge;
(B) Without having to establish a user
account or password;
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0057
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(C) Without having to submit personal
identifying information;
(D) Without having to enter a code to
access the list.
(ii) Be accessible to a common commercial
operator of an internet search engine to the extent
necessary for the search engine to index and display the
lists as a result in response to a search query of a user
of the search engine;
(iii) Be digitally searchable;
(iv) Use the naming convention specified by the
centers for Medicare and Medicaid services.
(f) Each facility shall update the lists required by
subsection (a) of this section not less than annually. Each
facility shall clearly indicate on its website the date
that the lists were updated.
35-2-1504. Monitoring.
(a) The department shall monitor each facility's
compliance with the requirements of this act using any of
the following methods:
(i) Evaluating complaints made by persons to the
department regarding noncompliance with the act;
(ii) Reviewing any analysis prepared regarding
noncompliance with this act;
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0057
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) Auditing the websites of facilities for
compliance with this act.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, in considering an application for renewal of a
facility's license or certificate, the department may
consider whether a facility is or has been in substantial
compliance with this act.
35-2-1505. Material violation; corrective action
plan.
(a) A facility materially violates this act if the
facility fails to comply with the requirements of W.S.
35-2-1503.
(b) If the department determines that a facility has
materially violated this act, the department shall issue a
material violation notice to the facility and require that
the facility submit a corrective action plan. The notice
shall indicate the form and manner that the corrective
action plan shall be submitted to the department and shall
clearly state the date by which the facility shall submit
the plan.
(c) The facility that receives a notice under
subsection (b) of this section shall:
(i) Submit a corrective action plan in the form
and manner, and by the specified date, prescribed by the
notice of violation; and
(ii) Act to comply with the corrective action
plan by the date required by paragraph (d)(ii) of this
section.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0057
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(d) A corrective action plan submitted to the
department shall:
(i) Describe in detail the corrective action the
facility will take to address any violation identified by
the department in the notice provided under subsection (b)
of this section; and
(ii) Provide a date that corresponds with
federal rules and regulations by which the facility will
complete the corrective action plan.
(e) A corrective action plan is subject to review and
approval by the department. After the department reviews
and approves a facility's corrective action plan, the
department shall monitor and evaluate the facility's
compliance with the plan.
35-2-1506. Civil penalty for violations.
(a) The department may impose a civil penalty on a
facility if a facility fails to:
(i) Respond to the department's notice to submit
a corrective action plan within the timeframe specified by
federal rules and regulations; or
(ii) Comply with the requirements of a
corrective action plan submitted to the department within
the timeframe specified by federal rules and regulations.
(b) A civil penalty imposed under subsection (a) of
this section shall be:
8

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0057
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(i) For facilities categorized as critical
access hospitals:
(A) For a first offense within any twelve
(12) month period, one hundred dollars ($100.00) per day
for each day the department imposes a civil penalty under
subsection (a) of this section;
(B) For a second offense within any twelve
(12) month period, five hundred dollars ($500.00) per day
for each day the department imposes a civil penalty under
subsection (a) of this section;
(C) For a third or subsequent offense
within any twelve (12) month period, one thousand dollars
($1,000.00) per day for each day the department imposes a
civil penalty under subsection (a) of this section.
(ii) For hospitals with prospective payment
systems, one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) per day for each
day within any twelve (12) month period the department
imposes a civil penalty under subsection (a) of this
section.
35-2-1507. Legislative recommendations.
The department may propose to the legislature any necessary
recommendations for amending this act, including
recommendations in response to amendments by the centers
for Medicare and Medicaid services to 45 C.F.R. part 180.
Section 2. W.S. 35‑2‑905(a) by creating a new
paragraph (vi) is amended to read:
9

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0057
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
35-2-905. Conditions, monitoring or revoking a
license.
(a) The division may place conditions upon a license,
install a division approved monitor or manager at the
owner's or operator's expense, suspend admissions, or deny,
suspend or revoke a license issued under this act if a
licensee:
(vi) Violates any provision of W.S. 35-2-1501
through 35-2-1507. This paragraph is repealed effective
July 1, 2029.
Section 3. The department of health shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.
10

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0057
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
11